Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4060.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 681. (1) An intermediate school district may establish an area career and technical education program and operate the program under sections 681 to 690 if approved by a majority of the intermediate school electors of the intermediate school district voting on the question. The election shall must be called and conducted in accordance with this act and the Michigan election law. The establishment of the area career and technical education program may be rescinded by the same process. (2) The question of establishing an area career and technical education program may be submitted to the intermediate school electors of an intermediate school district at a regular school election or at a special election held in each of the constituent districts. Subject to section 641 of the Michigan election law, MCL 168.641, the intermediate school board shall determine the date of the election and shall give notice to the school district filing official at least 60 days in advance of the date the ballot question is to be submitted to the intermediate school electors. (3) The ballot for referring the question of adopting sections 681 to 690 and establishing an area career and technical education program to the intermediate school electors of an intermediate school district shall must be substantially in the following form: "Shall ____________ (legal name of intermediate school district), state of Michigan, come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code and establish an area career and technical education program which is designed to encourage the operation of area career and technical education programs if the annual property tax levied for this purpose is limited to ______ mills? Yes ( ) No ( )". (4) Beginning in 1995, and subject Subject to section 625b, the number of mills of ad valorem property taxes an intermediate school board may levy for area career and technical education program operating purposes under sections 681 to 690 is limited to the following: (a) If the intermediate school district did not levy any millage in 1993 for area career and technical education program operating purposes under sections 681 to 690, the intermediate school board, with the approval of the intermediate school electors, may levy not more than 1 mill for those purposes. (b) If the intermediate school district levied millage in 1993 for area career and technical education program operating purposes under sections 681 to 690, the intermediate school board, with the approval of the intermediate school electors, may levy mills for those purposes at a rate not to exceed 1.5 times the number of mills authorized for those purposes in the intermediate school district in 1993. Approval of the intermediate school electors is not required for the levy under this subdivision of previously authorized mills until that authorization expires. (5) An intermediate school district that levies a tax for area career and technical education program operating purposes shall not use proceeds from the tax for any purpose other than area career and technical education program operating purposes and shall submit to the department of treasury a copy of the audit report from the audit of the intermediate school district conducted under section 622a. Beginning with school years starting after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, area career and technical education program operating purposes, as described in subsection (7), include, but are not limited to, an intermediate school district's contracting with another intermediate school district for the operation of the career and technical education program. If the department of treasury determines from the audit report that the proceeds from the tax have been used for a purpose other than area career and technical education program operating purposes, as defined under described in subsection (7), the department of treasury shall notify the intermediate school district of that determination. If the intermediate school district disputes the determination or claims that the situation has been corrected, within 15 days after receipt of the determination the intermediate school district may submit an appeal of the determination to the department of treasury. Within 90 days after receipt of the appeal, the department of treasury shall consider the appeal and make a determination of whether the initial determination was correct or incorrect and of whether the situation has been corrected. If the department of treasury finds that the initial determination was correct and that the situation has not been corrected, then the department of treasury shall file a copy of the report with the attorney general. The attorney general shall review the report and, if the attorney general considers it appropriate, shall commence or direct the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the violations occurred to commence appropriate proceedings against the intermediate school board or the official or employee. These proceedings shall must include at least a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of any public money determined by the audit to have been illegally expended and for the recovery of any public property determined by the audit to have been converted or misappropriated. (6) If the attorney general determines from a report filed under subsection (5) that an intermediate school district has misspent tax proceeds as described in subsection (5) and notifies the intermediate school district of this determination, the intermediate school district shall repay to its area career and technical education program operating fund an amount equal to the amount the department of treasury determined under subsection (5) has been used for a purpose other than area career and technical education program operating purposes. The intermediate school district shall make this repayment from funds of the intermediate school district that lawfully may be used for making such a repayment. (7) For the purposes of subsections (5) and (6), not later than January 1, 2008, the department and the department of treasury, in consultation with intermediate school districts, shall develop and make available to intermediate school districts a definition of area career and technical education program operating purposes. Beginning with school years starting after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, area career and technical education program operating purposes, as described in this subsection, include, but are not limited to, an intermediate school district's contracting with another intermediate school district for the operation of the career and technical education program. (8) An intermediate school district shall not hold more than 2 elections in a calendar year concerning the authorization of a millage rate for area career and technical education program operating purposes under sections 681 to 690. (9) Within 30 days after receiving the audit results, an intermediate school district shall publish the results of any audit conducted concerning the area career and technical education program on the intermediate school district's website. The results shall must remain posted on the website for at least 6 months. (10) The state board is the sole agency responsible for the supervision and administration of career and technical education in this state with authority to accept federal funding for career and technical education and with the responsibility to administer the requirements for career and technical education under federal and state law. Sec. 684. (1) An intermediate school board in which an area career and technical education program has been established may operate area career and technical education programs or may contract partially or entirely with local school districts, with other intermediate school districts within or outside of the service area designated by the department for the operation of the area career and technical education program, or with community colleges for the operation of the programs or with a private degree-granting postsecondary institution if the intermediate school district is not within a community college district. and if there existed on or before July 1, 1992 a written agreement for the operation of such a program. Area career and technical education programs operated under sections 681 to 690 shall must be submitted for review of the representatives of the constituent districts of the intermediate school district at an annual budget review meeting held on or before June 1 under section 624. (2) An intermediate school board may expend area career and technical education funds for the operation of area career and technical education programs for instructional, support, and administrative costs associated with providing career and technical education activities, including, but not limited to, staff salaries, wages, and benefits for career and technical education programs only; information and awareness activities; acquisition and rental of real property; construction of buildings; acquisition of equipment and supplies; and maintenance, repair, and replacement of buildings, lands, equipment, and supplies. An intermediate school board shall not expend area career and technical education funds for purposes other than those set forth in sections 681 to 690. An intermediate school board must obtain state approval to use state or federal career and technical education funds. Expenditure of vocational education millage revenue for the purposes allowed under this subsection shall must be determined by the intermediate school board. However, if the millage revenue is commingled with state or federal funds, then the intermediate school district must obtain state approval to use the commingled funds. If an audit by or on behalf of the department determines that an intermediate school board has expended area career and technical education funds for a purpose other than those set forth in sections 681 to 690, the intermediate school district is subject to the measures under section 681(5) and (6). (3) The intermediate school board shall ensure that all of the following are met: (a) The intermediate school board shall notify the department at the time the area career and technical education program is established. (b) In order to To be responsive to local workforce needs, emerging technologies, and local demand occupations, the intermediate school district shall establish a program advisory committee pursuant to administrative guidelines established by the office of career and technical preparation within the department. At least a majority of the members of the program advisory committee shall be representatives from business and industry. (c) The program shall must collect career and technical education information data and distribute that data to the appropriate state department or departments and to the program advisory committee. For the purposes of this subdivision, the department or CEPI shall only require an intermediate school district to report information that is not already available from the financial information database maintained by CEPI. (d) The intermediate school district shall submit its career and technical education plan to the department in the form and manner prescribed by the department. For the purposes of this subdivision, the department or CEPI shall only require an intermediate school district to report information that is not already available from the financial information database maintained by CEPI. (4) The department may monitor career and technical education programs funded with state or federal funding based upon on feedback from the program advisory committee and predetermined state or federal skills standards that include student outcomes. (5) The department, in consultation with the appropriate career and technical education professionals, shall develop a process for expedited state approval of programs that recognize local workforce needs, emerging technologies, and local demand occupations. (6) If there is a community college that offers career and technical preparation programs within the intermediate school district, the intermediate school board shall collaborate with the community college to minimize duplication of programs. (7) An area career and technical education program shall must allow participation by public school academy and nonpublic school pupils to the same extent as pupils of constituent districts. (8) An intermediate school board operating under sections 681 to 690 may expend funds received under section 683 for the costs of a special election held to renew or increase the millage limit on the annual property tax levied for area career and technical education purposes. (9) The treasurer of an intermediate school board shall pay out area career and technical education funds on order of the intermediate school board. (10) As used in this section, "CEPI" means the center for educational performance and information created in section 94a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1694a.